Louisiana, session 2026, HB1221.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:439(E)(2)(b) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§439. Tax on surplus lines and unauthorized insurance
* * *
E.
* * *
(2) An agreement entered into pursuant to this Subsection may provide for
any of the following:
* * *
(b) The collection of policy data in addition to premium, except that in no
case shall the collected data include the name of the insured, the address of the
insured, or the coverage limits of the insurance policy.
* * *
Section 2.(A) The provisions of R.S. 22:439(E)(2)(b) as enacted in Section 1 of this
Act shall supersede the provisions of R.S. 22:439(E)(2)(b) of Section 1 of Act No. 79 of the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2613 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1221
2025 Regular Session of the Legislature when Section 1 of Act No. 79 of the 2025 Regular
Session of the Legislature becomes effective.
(B) Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.